Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Administration and Management

47-23-20.
Administration; membership of the board; term; compensation; quorum.

There is created the Georgia Judicial Retirement System which shall be administered by the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System provided for by this Code section.

The board shall be composed of all members of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and three additional members appointed by the Governor, each of whom shall be either:

A superior court judge;

A state court judge;

A district attorney;

A state court solicitor-general; or

A juvenile court judge.

The first members appointed by the Governor pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be appointed to take office on July 1, 1998. The Governor shall designate two of the initial appointees to serve initial terms of two years and one of the initial appointees to serve a term of four years. Thereafter, the Governor shall appoint successors to take office upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Such members of the board shall be eligible for successive appointment as members and shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Any vacancy for any reason in the membership of the board appointed by the Governor shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the unexpired term.

The trustees may receive the daily expense allowance authorized for members of the General Assembly for each day spent attending meetings of the board of trustees and any committee meetings called pursuant to authorization of the board of trustees and for time spent in necessary travel. In addition to such amount, the trustees shall be reimbursed for all actual travel and other expenses necessarily incurred through service on the board of trustees. State officials serving ex officio shall not receive the daily expense allowance but shall be entitled to reimbursement of actual expenses.

Six members at any meeting of the board shall constitute a quorum to transact business, but the affirmative vote of five members shall be necessary for a decision by the board.

The officers and director of the board shall be the same as the officers and director of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-21.
Authority of board.

The board is given the following authority, powers, and duties:

To contract with proper federal authorities for old-age, survivors, and disability insurance coverage under the Social Security Act;

To provide for the collection of all moneys provided for in this chapter;

To provide for the payment of all administrative expenses;

To hear and decide all applications for retirement and disability benefits provided for under this chapter;

To adopt such tables as it shall deem desirable in connection with the proper operation of the retirement system;

To provide for the payment of all retirement and disability benefits that may be determined to be due under the rules and regulations as adopted by the board;

To make and promulgate all necessary rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of this state, to carry out this chapter and to distribute such rules and regulations to members of this retirement system;

To determine eligibility of persons to receive retirement benefits and disability benefits under this chapter;

To make provisions for refunds and repayments to persons who may be entitled to receive them; and

To keep records of all of its meetings.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this subsection, the board of trustees is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the maximum monthly retirement benefit payable under Article 7 of this chapter for persons theretofore or thereafter retiring under this chapter. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of trustees;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant. Any such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board of trustees shall determine.

No increase granted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall exceed 3 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect. Thereafter, such increases may be authorized effective as of January 1 and July 1 of each year; provided, however, that no such increase shall exceed 1 1/2 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect.

No increase shall be made pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection to become effective within six months of the effective date of any increase in the maximum retirement benefit granted by the General Assembly through amendment of Article 7 of this chapter.

The board shall also have all other powers necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this subsection, the board of trustees is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of establishing an employee contribution rate lower than as established in Article 5 of this chapter; provided, however, that such rate shall not be lower than 6 1/2 percent. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of trustees;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section, no member who becomes a member of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2009, shall be entitled to receive any postretirement benefit adjustment.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1071, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 320, § 4/HB 452.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 320, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly is desirous of providing an established annual cost-of-living adjustment to all current active and retired members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and the Georgia Judicial Retirement System. In order to do so, limiting future liability of the systems by adjusting the retirement expectations of persons who are newly employed is a regrettable but necessary step toward fiscal soundness.”

47-23-22.
Control of funds; investments.

The board shall be the trustees of the funds and shall have control of the funds provided for in this chapter and all funds received by the board shall be deposited into the Georgia Judicial Retirement System Fund. The benefits provided for in this chapter and all administrative expenses shall be paid from such fund. The board shall have authority to expend the funds in accordance with this chapter.

The board shall have full power to invest and reinvest such funds, subject to all the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.” Subject to such terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions, the board shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds are invested, including the proceeds of any investments and any money belonging to the fund.

The board is authorized to employ agents, including, but not limited to, banks or trust departments thereof, and to contract with such agents for their services as advisers and counselors, who will make recommendations for investments and make investments if the board so authorizes.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 13; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 31/HB 460.

47-23-23.
Gifts.

The board may take, by gift, grant, or bequest, any money, real or personal property, or any other thing of value and may hold or invest the same for the uses and purposes of the retirement system in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-24.
Records; audited annual financial statement.

The board shall keep permanent records of all its accounts in granting retirement and disability benefits and shall keep proper records and books concerning its operation. Each year the board shall publish an audited annual financial statement of the retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-25.
Payment of administrative expenses.

In order to pay the administrative expenses of the fund and upon the receipt of a request from the board on or after July 1, 1998, and each year thereafter, The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, The Council of State Court Judges of Georgia, the Council of Juvenile Court Judges, and the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia are authorized and directed to pay into the fund, from funds appropriated or otherwise available, an amount sufficient to pay the administrative expenses of the fund as certified by the board to The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, The Council of State Court Judges of Georgia, the Council of Juvenile Court Judges, and the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 15/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “In order to pay the administrative expenses of the fund and upon the receipt of a request from the board on or after July 1, 1998, and each year thereafter, the Department of Administrative Services is authorized and directed to pay into the fund, from funds appropriated or otherwise available for the operation of the superior courts of this state, an amount sufficient to pay the administrative expenses of the fund as certified by the board to the Department of Administrative Services.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, The Council of State Court Judges of Georgia” for “the Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, the Council of State Court Judges of Georgia” twice.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-23-26.
Administration of fund.

The board shall contract with the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for the administration of the fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-27.
Legal adviser.

The Attorney General shall be legal adviser of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-28.
Transfer of contributions from earlier funds.

All employer and employee contributions, plus the earnings on such amounts, made to a predecessor retirement system by or on behalf of any member of this retirement system, together with all other funds and assets held by such retirement systems shall be transferred to the Georgia Judicial Retirement System Fund created by this article on July 1, 1998.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-29.
Survivors benefits — Group term life insurance.

Wherever the term “survivors benefits” is used or referred to in this chapter, it shall be construed to be group term life insurance. Whenever reference is made in this Code section to members of this retirement system, such reference shall include active superior court judges subject to Chapter 8 of this title.

Pursuant to the provisions of this Code section and rules and regulations adopted for such purpose, the board of trustees may provide for survivors benefits for members, former members, and retired members of the retirement system; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall apply only to persons who are active members of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2002; provided, further, that no person who becomes or again becomes a member of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2009, shall be entitled to survivors benefits under this Code section.

Contributions for survivors benefits shall be provided for and administered in the following manner:

After notice from the board of trustees, each employer shall cause to be deducted from the earnable monthly compensation of each member an additional amount established by the board of trustees, but such amount shall not exceed one-half of 1 percent of the member’s earnable monthly compensation. Such deductions shall be made under the same conditions as set forth in Code Section 47-23-41. A member’s payment for coverage shall vest in the member no rights other than for the period for which the member has paid the required additional contributions into the survivors benefit fund; and

There is authorized an employer payment to the fund which shall be a percentage of the earnable monthly compensation of the members of the retirement system. The board of trustees shall establish the rate of such payment, but in no case shall such rate, when added to the members’ contributions, exceed 1 percent. Funds for employer payment shall be requested in the same manner as provided in Article 5 of this chapter.

The board of trustees may adopt any rules or regulations which are not in conflict with this Code section and which it deems necessary in establishing and maintaining the plan of operation, including benefit tables and other provisions of coverage.

The survivors benefits program may provide for a reduction of benefits after the attainment of a certain age and for a different or no contribution after retirement based on such reduction in benefits. The board of trustees is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this subsection.

Any other provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations to the contrary notwithstanding, any member who withdraws from service before attaining age 60 but whose right to a service retirement allowance has vested under Code Section 47-23-102 may continue paying the amount under this Code section which the member was paying at the time of withdrawing from service, together with the amount of the employer contribution in effect at the time of such withdrawal, in which case the benefits under this Code section shall remain fixed at the same amount as they would have been had the member died on the day immediately preceding the member’s withdrawal. Only those members with at least 18 years of creditable service at the time of withdrawal from service shall be eligible under this subsection, subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1485, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 32/HB 460; Ga. L. 2007, p. 176, § 4/HB 448; Ga. L. 2009, p. 398, § 4/SB 177.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the last proviso at the end of subsection (b).

47-23-30.
Contract for group term life insurance protection.

The board of trustees may provide group term life insurance protection for the members of the retirement system as the survivors benefits program provided for in Code Section 47-23-29 by contracting for such service with the board of trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for the inclusion of members of this retirement system in the program of group life insurance protection conducted for the benefit of the members of such retirement system. Such contract must provide benefits to those persons entitled to benefits under Code Section 47-23-29. Contributions for such coverage shall be provided for and collected as set forth in subsection (c) of Code Section 47-23-29.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1485, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 176, § 5/HB 448.

47-23-31.
Plan year designated.

For purposes of complying with federal Internal Revenue Service rules and regulations, the plan year for this retirement system shall be the 12 month period beginning on July 1 of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 32/HB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, Code Section 47-23-30, as enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 32, was redesignated as Code Section 47-23-31.